Tennessee, session 114, HB2472.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-13-212, is amended by deleting
subsection (a) and substituting:
(a)
(1) Criminally negligent conduct that results in death constitutes
criminally negligent homicide.
(2) As used in this subsection (a), "criminally negligent conduct” includes
failing or refusing to render aid to another who the person knows or reasonably
should know is unconscious or in need of medical care, and the person failing or
refusing to act knows or reasonably should know that the unconsciousness or
need for medical care occurred after the consumption of any controlled
substance, as defined in § 39-17-402.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2472
011158
- 1 -